Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 18

Sale of Cotton

43-18-101. Record to be made of purchases of seed cotton, loose or unbaled cotton, or cotton seed.

Any person purchasing cotton seed or seed cotton from anyone selling cotton seed or seed cotton in bags or baskets or any other cotton not baled shall keep a book in which that person shall keep a record of all cotton and cotton seed bought, and shall promptly enter the name and residence of all persons from whom the person buys cotton or cotton seed, followed by date of purchase, number of pounds bought, the amount paid for cotton of each kind, how the payment was made, whether by cash or check, whether it was raised or purchased by the seller, on whose farm raised, whether seller is renter or sharecropper, if mortgaged or otherwise encumbered and to whom. The entries are to be made in chronological order from day to day as the business is transacted. This book shall at all times be open to inspection of the police or other officers, or any person who may desire to see the book, and shall be in good faith kept and preserved by such dealers for convenient inspection.

Acts 1903, ch. 525, § 1; 1911, ch. 14, § 1; Shan., §§ 6800a3, 6800a6; Acts 1929, ch. 59, § 1; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5754, 11264; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2001.

Cross-References. Agriculture commodities promotion, title 43, ch. 29.

Compressed cotton by common carriers, § 65-20-101.

Contracts to raise and sell farm products, title 43, ch. 15.

Cooperative marketing associations, title 43, ch. 16.

Cotton arbitration, title 29, ch. 5, part 2.

Cotton ginner's lien, § 66-15-101.

Eradication of the Cotton Boll Weevil, title 43, ch. 6, part 4.

Promotion of leadership in agricultural and home economics programs at post-secondary institutions, title 49, ch. 7, part 7.

Sale of pecans, title 43, ch. 17.

Soybean promotion, title ch. 20.

Textile processors' lien, § 66-15-102.

Tobacco sales, title 43, ch. 19.

Vehicles exclusively transporting seed cotton modules, § 55-7-115.

Warehouse storage of baled cotton, § 68-102-152.

Comparative Legislation. Cotton and cotton seed:

Ala. Code § 2-19-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 2-20-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 10-4-50 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 69-3-23.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-429.1 et seq.

Collateral References. Agriculture
16.

43-18-102. Written permission to sell required — Exception.

Any person offering seed cotton for sale that the person did not personally raise, or on whose farm the cotton was not raised, shall be required by the buyer or dealer in the cotton to show a written permission from the party raising the cotton to sell it before buying, unless the party offering the cotton for sale is a bona fide owner of the cotton, and the dealer may require proper identification of the person offering it for sale.

Acts 1903, ch. 525, § 2; Shan., § 6800a4; Code 1932, § 11265; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2002.

43-18-103. Violation of § 43-18-101 or § 43-18-102 a misdemeanor — Penalty.

A violation of any of the provisions of § 43-18-101 or § 43-18-102 is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1911, ch. 14, § 2; Shan., § 6800a7; Acts 1929, ch. 59, § 2; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5755, 11266; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2003; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-18-104. Penalty recoverable by owner from purchaser not keeping the required record or not permitting inspection thereof.

In addition to the punishment provided in § 43-18-103, and either before or after, with or without criminal prosecution above provided for, the owner of any loose cotton or ginned cotton that is unbaled, that is sold by another without the owner's consent, can maintain and recover of any person buying such cotton who fails to comply with § 43-18-101 and § 43-18-102, a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), to be recovered by civil suit in any court having jurisdiction of the amount in this state. That amount is to be recovered by the owner of any cotton of the character described, sold to any person by any other than the owner without such owner's consent, where the buyer does not keep and permit to be inspected the record of the purchase provided for in this section and §§ 43-18-101 — 43-18-103.

Acts 1911, ch. 14, § 3; Shan., § 6800a8; Code 1932, § 11267; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2004.

43-18-105. Persons other than producers or dealers buying or selling lint cotton under two hundred fifty pounds — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person who is not a grower or producer of cotton, or who is not engaged in the business of buying and selling cotton, to buy, sell or offer for sale, or possess for purposes of sale, any loose lint cotton or ginned cotton that is not in bales, in quantities less than two hundred fifty pounds (250 lbs.).

Any violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1917, ch. 88, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 6800a9, 6800a10; Code 1932, §§ 11268, 11269; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2005; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-18-106. Additional penalty recoverable in qui tam action.

In addition to the punishment provided in § 43-18-105, and either before or after, with or without criminal prosecution, any person in interest can recover in such person's own name of any person buying loose or ginned cotton that is not baled, contrary to § 43-18-105, a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), to be recovered by civil suit in any court having jurisdiction of that amount.

Acts 1917, ch. 88, § 3; Shan., § 6800a11; Code 1932, § 11270; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2006.

43-18-107. Packages for domestic or surgical use exempt.

Sections 43-18-105 and 43-18-106 do not apply to the buying and selling of specially prepared packages of cotton, handled and sold by druggists and merchants for domestic and surgical use and purposes.

Acts 1917, ch. 88, § 4; Shan., § 6800a12; Code 1932, § 11271; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2007.

43-18-108. Hauling unbaled cotton between sunset and sunrise, where there is a lien, or undivided interest unlawful — Exception — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to haul or carry over any highway any cotton in the seed or ginned, but not baled, on which there is a lien, mortgage, contract for supplies and merchandise, or an undivided interest, between the hours of sunset of any one (1) day and sunrise of the succeeding day; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any person or persons hauling cotton to the gin for the purpose of ginning it, or from their farms to their houses or barns; and provided, further, that this section shall not apply where the beneficiary of the lien consents in writing to the hauling.

Any person violating this section commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1901, ch. 3, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 6800a1, 6800a2; Code 1932, §§ 11262, 11263; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2010; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

43-18-109. Liability of owner of gin or tobacco establishment for sale of product containing foreign objects.

If any person sells or otherwise disposes of cotton or tobacco fraudulently packed with wood, iron, rocks, dirt or other substance, the person at whose gin or establishment the cotton or tobacco was put up is deemed guilty of negligence, and shall, upon suit on behalf of any subsequent purchaser of the cotton or tobacco, pay double the value of the cotton or tobacco as damages, and also the cost of reshipping the cotton or tobacco from the market where the fraud was detected.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 67, § 3; Shan., § 6742; Code 1932, § 11149; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 43-2011; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 44.